Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB902.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Official Language Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The English language is the common and traditional language of the United States and this Commonwealth.(2) The use of a common language removes barriers of misunderstanding and helps to unify the citizens of the United States and this Commonwealth.(3) A compelling State interest exists in promoting, preserving and strengthening the use of the English language.(4) The Commonwealth should promote proficiency in the 123456789101112131415161718 English language to enable the full economic and civic participation of all of its residents.(5) A knowledge of the common language is essential to full exercise of constitutional freedoms, informed and knowledgeable empowerment as voters, citizen checks against government abuses and individual prosperity and independence.(6) The English language has been our strongest bond to one another as fellow citizens and has contributed substantially to national unity and societal cohesiveness.(7) English has been this nation's language by custom only and warrants special legal protection.(8) Government has a fiduciary responsibility to the citizenry to ensure that it operates as efficiently as possible, and the growth of multiple language bureaucracies and printing represents an abrogation of this fiduciary responsibility.(9) The Commonwealth and its municipalities and the Federal Government also have a responsibility to ensure that citizens have opportunities to learn English.(10) Among the powers reserved to this Commonwealth is the power to establish the English language as this Commonwealth's official language and to promote the use of the English language within this Commonwealth.Section 3. Purpose.(a) Unifying role.--It is the purpose of this act to preserve, protect and strengthen the unifying role of English as the official language of this Commonwealth.(b) Rights preserved.--This act shall not be construed to infringe on the rights of citizens, who have every right to choose their own primary language, in the use of language for 20250HB0902PN0943 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 private conduct, nor shall this act be used to dictate language policies for the operation and administration of organizations or businesses in the unregulated private sector.Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Official acts of government." Any of the following:(1) Actions of the Commonwealth and of its political subdivisions that carry the full weight and authority of law.(2) Orders, regulations, rules, statements of policy, adjudications, certificates, licenses, permits, notices, instruments or official documents issued, prescribed or promulgated by or under the authority of the Commonwealth and of its political subdivisions.Section 5. Designation of language of official acts.English is recognized as the official language of the Commonwealth and shall also be designated as the language of official acts of government.Section 6. Policies.Subject to the limitations in section 8, the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions may not make policies expressing a preference for any language other than English or diminishing or ignoring the unifying role of English as designated in this act.Section 7. Enforcement.Elected and appointed officers of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that the role of English as the official language is preserved and enhanced.Section 8. Limitations.20250HB0902PN0943 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The provisions of this act shall not apply to the following:(1) When Federal law imposes contrary provisions.(2) When the public safety, health or justice requires the use of other languages.(3) Instruction in foreign language courses.(4) Instruction designed to aid students with limited English proficiency in their transition and integration into the education system.(5) The promotion of international commerce or tourism.(6) When using terms of art or phrases from languages other than English.(7) The preservation or use of Native Alaskan or Native American languages as defined in the Native American Languages Act (Public Law 101-477, 104 Stat. 1153) or 20 U.S.C. Ch. 33 (relating to education of individuals with disabilities).(8) The creation or promotion of a State motto or State agency motto, the inscription of public monuments or the performance of other acts involving the customary use of languages other than English.(9) The protection of the rights of criminal defendants or victims of crime.(10) Unofficial communications, through any medium, between an individual and a member of the General Assembly or any officer or agent of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.Section 9. Restrictions on use of appropriated money.Subject to the limitations in section 8, an appropriation of the General Assembly may not be expended to promote the use of or demonstrate a preference for any language other than the 20250HB0902PN0943 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official language.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0902PN0943 - 5 - 123